Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.210

Reimbursement for contributions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A person may not, directly or indirectly, reimburse another person for a contribution to a candidate for public office, political committee, or political party.

[ 2024 c 164 s 463; 1995 c 397 s 26; 1993 c 2 s 18 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.485, 42.17.780.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.